Florida, session 2026, SB12.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 166 167 Section 1.âThe facts stated in the preamble to this act are 168 found and declared to be true. 169 Section 2.âThe City of Clearwater is authorized and 170 directed to appropriate from funds not otherwise encumbered and 171 to draw a warrant in the sum of $16,037,182.49, plus post 172 judgment interest at the rate of 9.46 percent annually, as 173 agreed to by the parties and to be calculated by the trial 174 court, payable to Maximus Giannikos as compensation for injuries 175 and damages sustained due to the negligence of the City of 176 Clearwater. 177 Section 3.âThe amount paid by the City of Clearwater 178 pursuant to s. 768.28, Florida Statutes, and the amount awarded 179 under this act are intended to provide the sole compensation for 180 all present and future claims arising out of the factual 181 situation described in this act which resulted in injuries and 182 damages to Maximus Giannikos. The total amount paid for attorney 183 fees relating to this claim may not exceed 25 percent of the 184 total amount awarded under this act. 185 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.